Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Oil and Gas Pipelines and Related Facilities

278.470.
Companies transporting oil or gas by pipeline are common carriers.

Every company receiving, transporting or delivering a supply of oil or natural gas for public consumption is declared to be a common carrier, and the receipt, transportation and delivery of natural gas into, through and from a pipeline operated by any such company is declared to be a public use.

History.

3766b-1b.

278.480.
Pipeline companies may deliver oil or gas on order of person in possession.

Any common carrier of crude petroleum or gas by pipeline may accept for transportation any oil or gas offered to it for that purpose by a person in possession, and shall redeliver it upon the order of the consignor unless prevented by order of a court of competent jurisdiction, and shall not be liable therefor to a true owner out of possession, except from the time that the order of court is served upon it in the same manner as a summons in a civil action.

History.

3766b-1a.

278.485.
Gas pipeline company to furnish gas — When — Rates — Duty of person applying for gas service and gas pipeline company — Abandonment of gas wells — Discontinuance of service — Right to tap a gathering line.

Every gas pipeline company obtaining gas from producing wells located within this state, upon the request of the owner of the property on or over which any producing well or gas gathering pipeline is located or the owner of real estate whose property and point of desired service is located within one-half (1/2) air-mile of said company’s producing gas well or gas gathering pipeline, shall furnish gas service to such owner and applicant, subject to and upon the following terms, conditions, and provisions, to-wit:

The gas service shall be furnished at rates and minimum monthly charges determined by the Public Service Commission.

The applicant for such gas service shall construct or cause to be constructed, and shall maintain and keep in good repair, the service lines, and shall provide and install or cause to be installed, and keep in good repair, the necessary automatic gas regulators, and shall pay the entire cost thereof. The company, at its own expense, shall provide, install, and maintain the necessary gas meters.

The construction of each service line; the installation, type, and number of automatic gas regulators and gas meter or meters, and the connection thereof with the gas producing well or pipeline shall be under the supervision of the Public Service Commission or an agent thereof; and shall conform to such standards of safety, location, and convenience as may be prescribed by said commission.

Neither the gas producer nor the gas pipeline company shall be responsible for maintaining any fixed or specified gas pressure. Neither the gas producer nor the gas pipeline company shall be liable for any accident or accidental injuries or damages which may result from any defect or failure of any automatic gas regulator or for any leakage or other defect or failure of any service line installed or constructed by the applicant.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring any gas pipeline company to serve any such owner of property or applicant from any line or lines that have been held to be subject to federal jurisdiction by order of the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission or a court of competent jurisdiction. The provisions of this section shall apply only to producing gas wells and to gas pipelines commonly known as gathering lines.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to restrict the right of any gas pipeline company to abandon any gas well or any gathering pipeline, or any part thereof, and to remove any such abandoned pipeline or lines. If service to any customer is terminated because of lack of gas for a period of six (6) months in a pipeline or line which served him, the company shall remove a portion of the main line so as to render it inoperable.

Subject to the rules and regulations of the Public Service Commission, any service may be disconnected and discontinued by the company for failure of the customer to pay any bill as and when due and payable.

Every gas pipeline company obtaining gas from producing wells within the state shall offer each surface owner the right of a tap or hookup for natural gas from any gathering line which crosses the surface owner’s property. The cost of the tap or hookup shall be borne by the consumer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 160; 1956, ch. 49; 1978, ch. 379, § 51, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 47, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 242, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1984, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 399, § 2, effective July 14, 1992.

278.490.
Transportation of oil or gas received from connecting lines.

Each company engaged in the receipt, transportation or delivery of oil or natural gas for public consumption shall at all reasonable times receive, for transportation and delivery, from such pipes as may be connected up with any main or tributary line, all oil or gas that may be held and stored or ready for delivery, if the main or tributary line has the means or capacity to receive, transport or deliver the oil or gas that is offered. If the main or tributary line is operating to such capacity that it is impossible or impracticable to receive or transport all the oil or gas offered from the connecting lines, the company operating the main or tributary line shall receive and transport the oil or gas that is offered on a proportionate basis, based on the daily production of each producer whose oil or gas is offered for transportation.

History.

3766b-1c, 3766b-1d.

278.495.
Authority to regulate safety aspects of natural gas facilities.

As used in this section:

“Carbon dioxide transmission pipeline” means the in-state portion of a pipeline, including appurtenant facilities, property rights, and easements, that is used exclusively for the purpose of transporting carbon dioxide to a point of sale, storage, or other carbon management applications; and

“Master meter system” means a pipeline system for distributing gas within a definable area, such as, but not limited to, a mobile home park, housing project, or apartment complex, where the operator purchases metered gas from an outside source for resale through a gas distribution pipeline system. The gas distribution pipeline system supplies the ultimate consumer, who either purchases the gas directly through a meter or by other means, such as through rents.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the commission shall have the authority to regulate the safety of natural gas facilities which are:

Owned or operated by any public utility, county, or city, and used to distribute natural gas at retail; or

Comprising a master meter system.

The commission may exercise this authority in conjunction with, and pursuant to, its authority to enforce any minimum safety standard adopted by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to 49

U.S.C. sec. 60101

et seq., or any amendments thereto, and may promulgate administrative regulations consistent with federal pipeline safety laws in accordance with provisions of KRS Chapter 13A as are necessary to promote pipeline safety in the Commonwealth. In exercising this authority, however, the commission shall consider the impact of any action it takes on small businesses engaged in the installation and servicing of gas lines, master meter systems, or related equipment and shall act so as to ensure that no unfair competitive advantage is given to utilities over such small businesses.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 152, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 249, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2011, ch. 82, § 4, effective June 8, 2011.

278.500.
Condemnation of property for pipe line. [Repealed.]

278.501.
Condemnation for oil or gas pipeline storage facilities used in connection therewith. [Repealed.]

278.502.
Condemnation for pipelines and related facilities, including rights of ingress and egress.

Any corporation or partnership organized for the purpose of, and any individual engaged in or proposing to engage in, constructing, maintaining, or operating oil or gas wells or pipelines for transporting or delivering oil or gas, including oil and gas products, in public service may, if it is unable to contract or agree with the owner after a good faith effort to do so, condemn the lands and material or the use and occupation of the lands that are necessary for constructing, maintaining, drilling, utilizing, and operating pipelines, underground oil or gas storage fields, and wells giving access thereto and all necessary machinery, equipment, pumping stations, appliances, and fixtures, including tanks and telephone lines, and other communication facilities, for use in connection therewith, and the necessary rights of ingress and egress to construct, examine, alter, repair, maintain, operate, or remove such pipelines or underground gas storage fields, to drill new wells and utilize existing wells in connection therewith, and remove pipe, casing, equipment, and other facilities relating to such underground storage fields and access wells. The proceedings for condemnation shall be as provided in the Eminent Domain Act of Kentucky.

History.

Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 186, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 226; 1976, ch. 140, § 112; 1992, ch. 399, § 1, effective July 14, 1992.